Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 7. Real Estate Loans.

§ 6.2-1179.
Real estate loans; required investment.

A state savings institution may originate, invest in, sell, purchase, service, participate, or otherwise deal in loans secured by a lien on real estate, subject to the requirements of this chapter. Such loans that are insured, guaranteed or made under a firm commitment to be sold, assigned or otherwise transferred to an agency or instrumentality of the federal government or to a corporation organized under the laws of the United States, including the Department of Housing and Urban Development, the Department of Veterans Affairs, the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Government National Mortgage Association or the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, may be made in accordance with the requirements of such federal agencies, instrumentalities or corporations.

At least 60 percent of assets of a state savings institution shall be invested in real estate loans. For purposes of meeting this 60-percent requirement, a savings institution may include (i) loans secured by a lien on a manufactured building or buildings; (ii) the value of securities held by it that represent a beneficial interest, participation interest or other similar interest in loans secured by a lien on real estate including participation certificates issued by the Federal National Mortgage Association, Government National Mortgage Association or the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation; and (iii) the value of liquid assets equal to the minimum liquid asset requirement for membership in a Federal Home Loan Bank.

A state savings institution may not purchase, participate in or acquire an interest in any real estate loan that it could not legally make, without the prior approval of the Commissioner.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.62; 1990, c. 3; 2010, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Department of Veterans Affairs” was substituted for “Veterans Administration” in subsection A.

§ 6.2-1180.
Appraisals; loan-to-value ratios.

A savings institution may make a real estate loan only after a qualified person designated by the savings institution has submitted a signed appraisal of the security property, except that an insured or guaranteed loan may be made on the basis of a valuation of the security property furnished to the savings institution by the insuring or guaranteeing agency.

At the time of origination, a real estate loan may not exceed 100 percent of the appraised fair market value of the security property. During the term of the loan, the loan-to-value ratio may increase above the maximum permissible percentage if the increase results from an adjustment authorized by §

6.2-1182

. In the case of a home loan secured by borrower-occupied property, the loan balance may not exceed 125 percent of the original appraised value of the property during the term of the loan, unless the loan contract provides that the payment shall be adjusted at least once every five years, beginning no later than the 10th year of the loan, to a level sufficient to amortize the loan at the then-existing interest rate and loan balance for the remaining term of the loan. The 125 percent limitation shall not apply to that portion of a loan balance that is interest received in the form of a percentage of the appreciation in value of the security property.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.63; 1991, c. 230, § 6.1-194.151; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1181.
Initial repayments on real estate loans.

Repayments on real estate loans shall begin not later than 60 days after the loan proceeds are disbursed. If such loan is for construction, substantial alteration, repair, or improvement of the real estate securing the loan, repayments may begin not later than 60 months after the date of the first loan disbursement, and interest shall be payable at least semiannually until regular periodic payments begin. In the case of a home loan where the loan proceeds are to be used for construction, substantial alteration, repair, or improvement of the security property, repayments must begin not later than 36 months after the date of the first disbursement, with interest payable at least semiannually until regular periodic payments begin.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.64; 1991, c. 230, § 6.1-194.151; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1182.
Adjustable real estate loans.

A state savings institution may adjust the interest rate, payment, balance, or term to maturity on any real estate loan as authorized by the loan contract, and may receive a portion of the consideration for making a real estate loan in the form of a percentage of the amount by which the current market value of the property, during the loan term or at maturity, exceeds the original appraised value.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.65; 1991, c. 230, § 6.1-194.151; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1183.
Special provisions for home loans.

The loan term of a home loan shall not exceed 40 years, with interest payable at least semiannually, except as expressly authorized elsewhere in this chapter. Payments on the loan balance, for other than nonamortized and line-of-credit loans, shall be made in at least semiannual installments, except that loans made on the security of farm residences and combinations of farm residences and commercial farm real estate may be repayable in annual installments. The loan may be fully amortized, partially amortized, nonamortized, or a line-of-credit loan. The loan contract may provide for the deferral of principal and capitalization of a portion of interest, or of all interest on loans to natural persons secured by borrower-occupied property and on which periodic advances are being made.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.66; 1991, c. 230, § 6.1-194.151; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1184.
Dealing with successors in interest.

In the case of any investment made by a savings institution in a real estate loan, if (i) the ownership of the real estate security or any part thereof becomes vested in a person other than the party originally executing the security instruments and (ii) there is not an agreement in writing to the contrary, a savings institution may, without notice to such party, deal with such successor in interest with reference to that mortgage and the debt thereby secured in the same manner as with such party. The savings institution may forbear to sue or may extend time for payment, or otherwise modify the terms, of the debt secured thereby without discharging or in any way affecting the original liability of such party or parties thereunder or upon the debt thereby secured.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.67; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1185.
Trustees on loans secured by deed of trust.

Any savings institution in connection with making loans secured by deed of trust is empowered to elect a trustee, which may be a service corporation, at such times and for such terms as may be prescribed by its charter or bylaws. All the rights, titles, duties, and obligations of such a trustee relating to loans secured by deed of trust shall pass by operation of law to his successor in office. Every right of the savings institution required to be exercised by or through such trustee, whether it is the sale of property or some other act, shall be done, enforced and carried out by the trustee in office at the time when such rights are exercised by or for the savings institution. All sales or conveyances heretofore or hereafter made by a trustee appointed in the manner designated in this section shall be as valid and binding as though the sale or conveyance had been made by the trustee named in the deed of trust. A majority of the trustees in office are empowered to conduct sales and make conveyances in pursuance thereof with the same force and effect as though all the trustees had acted; and when there are two trustees either one may act.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.68; 2010, c. 794.